Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2240.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), on and after
July 1, 2025, no state agency shall seek or implement any:
(1) Public assistance program waiver or other authorization from
the federal government, including, but not limited to, a medicaid state
plan, state plan amendment, state demonstration or a waiver pursuant to
section 1115 or 1915 of the federal social security act, that would
expand eligibility for any public assistance program to any additional
individuals or class of individuals or would increase any cost to the
state unless the legislature expressly consents to and approves of such
waiver or other authorization by an act of the legislature; or
(2) changes to funding structures, day services or targeted case
management services for persons with intellectual or developmental
disabilities unless the legislature expressly consents to and approves of
such change by an act of the legislature.
(b) (1) When the legislature is not in session, a state agency may
request that the legislative coordinating council approve a public
assistance program waiver or other authorization or a change to funding
structures, day services or targeted case management services for
persons with intellectual or developmental disabilities.
(2) A state agency shall provide official notification to the
legislative coordinating council that such agency is requesting approval
of an action that requires legislative approval pursuant to this section.
Upon official receipt of such notification, the legislative coordinating
council shall meet within 14 calendar days to consider and take action
on such request.
(3) Pursuant to K.S.A. 46-1202, and amendments thereto, the
legislative coordinating council may take action to approve or refuse a
state agency's request or designate a standing committee or special
committee to review such state agency's request and make
recommendations to the legislative coordinating council based on the
committee's review.
(c) For purposes of this section:
(1) "Public assistance program" means any assistance under
K.S.A. 39-709, and amendments thereto; and

SENATE Substitute for HOUSE BILL No. 2240—page 2
(2) "state agency" means the same as defined in K.S.A. 75-3701,
and amendments thereto.
Sec. 2. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.
I hereby certify that the above BILL originated in the HOUSE, and was
adopted by that body
HOUSE adopted
Conference Committee Report
Speaker of the House.
Chief Clerk of the House.
Passed the SENATE
as amended
SENATE adopted
Conference Committee Report
President of the Senate.
Secretary of the Senate.
APPROVED
Governor.